Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7220.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 4-13-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 4-13 entitled "Dogs" is hereby
amended to read as follows:
4-13-4. Dog licenses — Fees — Penalties.
(a)(1) Every owner or keeper of a dog shall annually, in April, obtain a license effective
May 1 through the office of the city or town clerk of the city or town in which the owner or keeper
resides.
(2) The fees for the license shall be five dollars ($5.00).
(3) No city or town shall issue any license under this section unless the dog has been
inoculated against rabies for the period of time which the license would be valid.
(4) All licenses issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be valid in every city or
town during the then-current year.
(5) Any person who becomes the owner or keeper of a dog shall obtain a license within
thirty (30) days after he or she becomes the owner or keeper.
(6)(i) The Cumberland town clerk may issue a license renewable every two (2) years for a
licensing fee of six dollars ($6.00).
(ii) Glocester town council may provide for an annual licensing fee of fourteen dollars
($14.00) for all dogs, except spayed or neutered females and males, and for an annual licensing fee
of seven dollars ($7.00) for spayed or neutered female and male dogs.
(iii) Jamestown town council may provide, by ordinance, for an annual licensing fee not to

exceed fifteen dollars ($15.00) for neutered dogs, and not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00)
for unneutered dogs.
(iv) Newport city council may, however, provide, by ordinance, for an annual licensing fee
of not more than ten dollars ($10.00) for all spayed and neutered dogs, and for an annual licensing
fee of not more than fifteen dollars ($15.00) for unspayed females and unneutered males.
(v) North Smithfield town council may provide, by ordinance, for an annual licensing fee
of five dollars ($5.00) for all dogs.
(vi)(A) South Kingstown town council may provide for an annual licensing fee of twelve
dollars ($12.00) for all dogs, except spayed or neutered female and male dogs, and for an annual
licensing fee of seven dollars ($7.00) for spayed or neutered female and male dogs.
(B) The South Kingstown town council may assess an impound fee.
(vii)(A) Westerly town council may provide, by ordinance, for an annual license fee of ten
dollars ($10.00) for unspayed female dogs and unneutered male dogs;
(B) May provide for a fee of one dollar ($1.00) for the replacement of lost dog tags;
(C) May provide that no fee be charged to license guide dogs used by persons with
disabilities;
(D) May provide for the number of licensed dogs which may be kept at any single-family
residence, other than a breeding kennel; and
(E) May provide for pecuniary penalties not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for
violations.
(viii) Woonsocket city council may provide, by ordinance, for an annual licensing fee of
five dollars ($5.00) for all dogs.
(ix)(A) West Warwick town council may provide, by ordinance, for an annual license fee
of seven dollars ($7.00) for each neutered male or spayed female and fifteen dollars ($15.00) for
each unneutered male and unspayed female.
(B) May provide, by ordinance, for a payment of a two dollars ($2.00) fee for duplicate or
for replacement tags.
(x)(A) Pawtucket city council may provide, by ordinance, for an annual licensing fee not
to exceed fifteen dollars ($15.00) for spayed or neutered dogs, and not to exceed twenty-five dollars
($25.00) for unspayed or unneutered dogs.
(B) May provide, by ordinance, for an annual licensing fee for dogs owned by residents
age 65 or older not to exceed five dollars ($5.00) for spayed or neutered dogs, and not to exceed
ten dollars ($10.00) for unspayed or unneutered dogs.
(xi) Scituate town council may provide, by ordinance, for an annual license fee not to
LC004063 - Page 2 of 4

exceed twenty ($20.00) dollars for all dogs.
(xii) Burrillville town council may:
(A) Provide, by ordinance, for an annual licensing fee of not more than ten dollars ($10.00)
for all dogs; and
(B) Provide for pecuniary penalties not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for
violations.
(xiii) The Middletown town council may:
(A) Provide, by ordinance, for an annual licensing fee not to exceed twenty-five dollars
($25.00) per dog.
(xiv) Foster town council may:
(A) Provide, by ordinance, for an annual or biennial licensing fee not to exceed fifteen
dollars ($15.00) for all dogs; and
(B) Provide for pecuniary damages not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for
violations.
(xv) The Barrington town council may provide, by ordinance, for an annual licensing fee
of not more than seven dollars ($7.00) per dog.
(b) Every person, owning or keeping a dog not licensed and/or collared according to the
provisions of this chapter, shall be fined ten dollars ($10.00) to be applied to the support of the city
or town, and that fine shall be in addition to all other lawful fees.
(c) Any city or town may waive the fee to be charged to license guide dogs used by persons
with disabilities.
(d) In the city of Woonsocket, every person owning or keeping a dog not licensed and/or
collared according to the provisions of this chapter shall be fined fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first
offense; one hundred dollars ($100) for the second offense; and one hundred fifty dollars ($150)
for the third and subsequent offenses.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004063
========
LC004063 - Page 3 of 4